Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.050

Correctional employees.

Any correctional employee, while acting in the supervision and transportation of prisoners, and in the apprehension of prisoners who have escaped, shall have the powers and duties of a peace officer.

[ 1992 c 7 s 22; 1955 c 241 s 5.]